epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/bg.xml
	<patterns>
		1а1
		1б1
		1в1
		1г1
		1д1
		1е1
		1ж1
		1з1
		1и1
		1й1
		1к1
		1л1
		1м1
		1н1
		1о1
		1п1
		1р1
		1с1
		1т1
		1у1
		1ф1
		1х1
		1ц1
		1ч1
		1ш1
		1щ1
		1ъ1
		0ь0
		1ю1
		1я1
		б4а
		б4е
		б4и
		б4о
		б4у
		б4ъ
		б4ю
		б4я
		в4а
		в4е
		в4и
		в4о
		в4у
		в4ъ
		в4ю
		в4я
		г4а
		г4е
		г4и
		г4о
		г4у
		г4ъ
		г4ю
		г4я
		д4а
		д4е
		д4и
		д4о
		д4у
		д4ъ
		д4ю
		д4я
		ж4а
		ж4е
		ж4и
		ж4о
		ж4у
		ж4ъ
		ж4ю
		ж4я
		з4а
		з4е
		з4и
		з4о
		з4у
		з4ъ
		з4ю
		з4я
		й4а
		й4е
		й4и
		й4о
		й4у
		й4ъ
		й4ю
		й4я
		к4а
		к4е
		к4и
		к4о
		к4у
		к4ъ
		к4ю
		к4я
		л4а
		л4е
		л4и
		л4о
		л4у
		л4ъ
		л4ю
		л4я
		м4а
		м4е
		м4и
		м4о
		м4у
		м4ъ
		м4ю
		м4я
		н4а
		н4е
		н4и
		н4о
		н4у
		н4ъ
		н4ю
		н4я
		п4а
		п4е
		п4и
		п4о
		п4у
		п4ъ
		п4ю
		п4я
		р4а
		р4е
		р4и
		р4о
		р4у
		р4ъ
		р4ю
		р4я
		с4а
		с4е
		с4и
		с4о
		с4у
		с4ъ
		с4ю
		с4я
		т4а
		т4е
		т4и
		т4о
		т4у
		т4ъ
		т4ю
		т4я
		ф4а
		ф4е
		ф4и
		ф4о
		ф4у
		ф4ъ
		ф4ю
		ф4я
		х4а
		х4е
		х4и
		х4о
		х4у
		х4ъ
		х4ю
		х4я
		ц4а
		ц4е
		ц4и
		ц4о
		ц4у
		ц4ъ
		ц4ю
		ц4я
		ч4а
		ч4е
		ч4и
		ч4о
		ч4у
		ч4ъ
		ч4ю
		ч4я
		ш4а
		ш4е
		ш4и
		ш4о
		ш4у
		ш4ъ
		ш4ю
		ш4я
		щ4а
		щ4е
		щ4и
		щ4о
		щ4у
		щ4ъ
		щ4ю
		щ4я
		ь4а
		ь4е
		ь4и
		ь4о
		ь4у
		ь4ъ
		ь4ю
		ь4я
		4б3б4
		2б3в2
		2б3г2
		2б3д2
		2б3ж2
		2б3з2
		2б3й2
		2б3к2
		2б3л2
		2б3м2
		2б3н2
		2б3п2
		2б3р2
		2б3с2
		2б3т2
		2б3ф2
		2б3х2
		2б3ц2
		2б3ч2
		2б3ш2
		2б3щ2
		2в3б2
		4в3в4
		2в3г2
		2в3д2
		2в3ж2
		2в3з2
		2в3й2
		2в3к2
		2в3л2
		2в3м2
		2в3н2
		2в3п2
		2в3р2
		2в3с2
		2в3т2
		2в3ф2
		2в3х2
		2в3ц2
		2в3ч2
		2в3ш2
		2в3щ2
		2г3б2
		2г3в2
		4г3г4
		2г3д2
		2г3ж2
		2г3з2
		2г3й2
		2г3к2
		2г3л2
		2г3м2
		2г3н2
		2г3п2
		2г3р2
		2г3с2
		2г3т2
		2г3ф2
		2г3х2
		2г3ц2
		2г3ч2
		2г3ш2
		2г3щ2
		2д3б2
		2д3в2
		2д3г2
		4д3д4
		3д4ж
		2д3з2
		2д3й2
		2д3к2
		2д3л2
		2д3м2
		2д3н2
		2д3п2
		2д3р2
		2д3с2
		2д3т2
		2д3ф2
		2д3х2
		2д3ц2
		2д3ч2
		2д3ш2
		2д3щ2
		2ж3б2
		2ж3в2
		2ж3г2
		2ж3д2
		4ж3ж4
		2ж3з2
		2ж3й2
		2ж3к2
		2ж3л2
		2ж3м2
		2ж3н2
		2ж3п2
		2ж3р2
		2ж3с2
		2ж3т2
		2ж3ф2
		2ж3х2
		2ж3ц2
		2ж3ч2
		2ж3ш2
		2ж3щ2
		2з3б2
		2з3в2
		2з3г2
		2з3д2
		2з3ж2
		4з3з4
		2з3й2
		2з3к2
		2з3л2
		2з3м2
		2з3н2
		2з3п2
		2з3р2
		2з3с2
		2з3т2
		2з3ф2
		2з3х2
		2з3ц2
		2з3ч2
		2з3ш2
		2з3щ2
		2й3б2
		2й3в2
		2й3г2
		2й3д2
		2й3ж2
		2й3з2
		4й3й4
		2й3к2
		2й3л2
		2й3м2
		2й3н2
		2й3п2
		2й3р2
		2й3с2
		2й3т2
		2й3ф2
		2й3х2
		2й3ц2
		2й3ч2
		2й3ш2
		2й3щ2
		2к3б2
		2к3в2
		2к3г2
		2к3д2
		2к3ж2
		2к3з2
		2к3й2
		4к3к4
		2к3л2
		2к3м2
		2к3н2
		2к3п2
		2к3р2
		2к3с2
		2к3т2
		2к3ф2
		2к3х2
		2к3ц2
		2к3ч2
		2к3ш2
		2к3щ2
		2л3б2
		2л3в2
		2л3г2
		2л3д2
		2л3ж2
		2л3з2
		2л3й2
		2л3к2
		4л3л4
		2л3м2
		2л3н2
		2л3п2
		2л3р2
		2л3с2
		2л3т2
		2л3ф2
		2л3х2
		2л3ц2
		2л3ч2
		2л3ш2
		2л3щ2
		2м3б2
		2м3в2
		2м3г2
		2м3д2
		2м3ж2
		2м3з2
		2м3й2
		2м3к2
		2м3л2
		4м3м4
		2м3н2
		2м3п2
		2м3р2
		2м3с2
		2м3т2
		2м3ф2
		2м3х2
		2м3ц2
		2м3ч2
		2м3ш2
		2м3щ2
		2н3б2
		2н3в2
		2н3г2
		2н3д2
		2н3ж2
		2н3з2
		2н3й2
		2н3к2
		2н3л2
		2н3м2
		4н3н4
		2н3п2
		2н3р2
		2н3с2
		2н3т2
		2н3ф2
		2н3х2
		2н3ц2
		2н3ч2
		2н3ш2
		2н3щ2
		2п3б2
		2п3в2
		2п3г2
		2п3д2
		2п3ж2
		2п3з2
		2п3й2
		2п3к2
		2п3л2
		2п3м2
		2п3н2
		4п3п4
		2п3р2
		2п3с2
		2п3т2
		2п3ф2
		2п3х2
		2п3ц2
		2п3ч2
		2п3ш2
		2п3щ2
		2р3б2
		2р3в2
		2р3г2
		2р3д2
		2р3ж2
		2р3з2
		2р3й2
		2р3к2
		2р3л2
		2р3м2
		2р3н2
		2р3п2
		4р3р4
		2р3с2
		2р3т2
		2р3ф2
		2р3х2
		2р3ц2
		2р3ч2
		2р3ш2
		2р3щ2
		2с3б2
		2с3в2
		2с3г2
		2с3д2
		2с3ж2
		2с3з2
		2с3й2
		2с3к2
		2с3л2
		2с3м2
		2с3н2
		2с3п2
		2с3р2
		4с3с4
		2с3т2
		2с3ф2
		2с3х2
		2с3ц2
		2с3ч2
		2с3ш2
		2с3щ2
		2т3б2
		2т3в2
		2т3г2
		2т3д2
		2т3ж2
		2т3з2
		2т3й2
		2т3к2
		2т3л2
		2т3м2
		2т3н2
		2т3п2
		2т3р2
		2т3с2
		4т3т4
		2т3ф2
		2т3х2
		2т3ц2
		2т3ч2
		2т3ш2
		2т3щ2
		2ф3б2
		2ф3в2
		2ф3г2
		2ф3д2
		2ф3ж2
		2ф3з2
		2ф3й2
		2ф3к2
		2ф3л2
		2ф3м2
		2ф3н2
		2ф3п2
		2ф3р2
		2ф3с2
		2ф3т2
		4ф3ф4
		2ф3х2
		2ф3ц2
		2ф3ч2
		2ф3ш2
		2ф3щ2
		2х3б2
		2х3в2
		2х3г2
		2х3д2
		2х3ж2
		2х3з2
		2х3й2
		2х3к2
		2х3л2
		2х3м2
		2х3н2
		2х3п2
		2х3р2
		2х3с2
		2х3т2
		2х3ф2
		4х3х4
		2х3ц2
		2х3ч2
		2х3ш2
		2х3щ2
		2ц3б2
		2ц3в2
		2ц3г2
		2ц3д2
		2ц3ж2
		2ц3з2
		2ц3й2
		2ц3к2
		2ц3л2
		2ц3м2
		2ц3н2
		2ц3п2
		2ц3р2
		2ц3с2
		2ц3т2
		2ц3ф2
		2ц3х2
		4ц3ц4
		2ц3ч2
		2ц3ш2
		2ц3щ2
		2ч3б2
		2ч3в2
		2ч3г2
		2ч3д2
		2ч3ж2
		2ч3з2
		2ч3й2
		2ч3к2
		2ч3л2
		2ч3м2
		2ч3н2
		2ч3п2
		2ч3р2
		2ч3с2
		2ч3т2
		2ч3ф2
		2ч3х2
		2ч3ц2
		4ч3ч4
		2ч3ш2
		2ч3щ2
		2ш3б2
		2ш3в2
		2ш3г2
		2ш3д2
		2ш3ж2
		2ш3з2
		2ш3й2
		2ш3к2
		2ш3л2
		2ш3м2
		2ш3н2
		2ш3п2
		2ш3р2
		2ш3с2
		2ш3т2
		2ш3ф2
		2ш3х2
		2ш3ц2
		2ш3ч2
		4ш3ш4
		2ш3щ2
		2щ3б2
		2щ3в2
		2щ3г2
		2щ3д2
		2щ3ж2
		2щ3з2
		2щ3й2
		2щ3к2
		2щ3л2
		2щ3м2
		2щ3н2
		2щ3п2
		2щ3р2
		2щ3с2
		2щ3т2
		2щ3ф2
		2щ3х2
		2щ3ц2
		2щ3ч2
		2щ3ш2
		4щ3щ4
		ааа4
		аае4
		ааи4
		аао4
		аау4
		ааъ4
		ааю4
		аая4
		аеа4
		аее4
		аеи4
		аео4
		аеу4
		аеъ4
		аею4
		аея4
		аиа4
		аие4
		аии4
		аио4
		аиу4
		аиъ4
		аию4
		аия4
		аоа4
		аое4
		аои4
		аоо4
		аоу4
		аоъ4
		аою4
		аоя4
		ауа4
		ауе4
		ауи4
		ауо4
		ауу4
		ауъ4
		аую4
		ауя4
		аъа4
		аъе4
		аъи4
		аъо4
		аъу4
		аъъ4
		аъю4
		аъя4
		аюа4
		аюе4
		аюи4
		аюо4
		аюу4
		аюъ4
		аюю4
		аюя4
		аяа4
		аяе4
		аяи4
		аяо4
		аяу4
		аяъ4
		аяю4
		аяя4
		еаа4
		еае4
		еаи4
		еао4
		еау4
		еаъ4
		еаю4
		еая4
		ееа4
		еее4
		ееи4
		еео4
		ееу4
		ееъ4
		еею4
		еея4
		еиа4
		еие4
		еии4
		еио4
		еиу4
		еиъ4
		еию4
		еия4
		еоа4
		еое4
		еои4
		еоо4
		еоу4
		еоъ4
		еою4
		еоя4
		еуа4
		еуе4
		еуи4
		еуо4
		еуу4
		еуъ4
		еую4
		еуя4
		еъа4
		еъе4
		еъи4
		еъо4
		еъу4
		еъъ4
		еъю4
		еъя4
		еюа4
		еюе4
		еюи4
		еюо4
		еюу4
		еюъ4
		еюю4
		еюя4
		еяа4
		еяе4
		еяи4
		еяо4
		еяу4
		еяъ4
		еяю4
		еяя4
		иаа4
		иае4
		иаи4
		иао4
		иау4
		иаъ4
		иаю4
		иая4
		иеа4
		иее4
		иеи4
		иео4
		иеу4
		иеъ4
		иею4
		иея4
		ииа4
		иие4
		иии4
		иио4
		ииу4
		ииъ4
		иию4
		иия4
		иоа4
		иое4
		иои4
		иоо4
		иоу4
		иоъ4
		иою4
		иоя4
		иуа4
		иуе4
		иуи4
		иуо4
		иуу4
		иуъ4
		иую4
		иуя4
		иъа4
		иъе4
		иъи4
		иъо4
		иъу4
		иъъ4
		иъю4
		иъя4
		июа4
		июе4
		июи4
		июо4
		июу4
		июъ4
		июю4
		июя4
		ияа4
		ияе4
		ияи4
		ияо4
		ияу4
		ияъ4
		ияю4
		ияя4
		оаа4
		оае4
		оаи4
		оао4
		оау4
		оаъ4
		оаю4
		оая4
		оеа4
		оее4
		оеи4
		оео4
		оеу4
		оеъ4
		оею4
		оея4
		оиа4
		оие4
		оии4
		оио4
		оиу4
		оиъ4
		оию4
		оия4
		ооа4
		оое4
		оои4
		ооо4
		ооу4
		ооъ4
		оою4
		ооя4
		оуа4
		оуе4
		оуи4
		оуо4
		оуу4
		оуъ4
		оую4
		оуя4
		оъа4
		оъе4
		оъи4
		оъо4
		оъу4
		оъъ4
		оъю4
		оъя4
		оюа4
		оюе4
		оюи4
		оюо4
		оюу4
		оюъ4
		оюю4
		оюя4
		ояа4
		ояе4
		ояи4
		ояо4
		ояу4
		ояъ4
		ояю4
		ояя4
		уаа4
		уае4
		уаи4
		уао4
		уау4
		уаъ4
		уаю4
		уая4
		уеа4
		уее4
		уеи4
		уео4
		уеу4
		уеъ4
		уею4
		уея4
		уиа4
		уие4
		уии4
		уио4
		уиу4
		уиъ4
		уию4
		уия4
		уоа4
		уое4
		уои4
		уоо4
		уоу4
		уоъ4
		уою4
		уоя4
		ууа4
		ууе4
		ууи4
		ууо4
		ууу4
		ууъ4
		уую4
		ууя4
		уъа4
		уъе4
		уъи4
		уъо4
		уъу4
		уъъ4
		уъю4
		уъя4
		уюа4
		уюе4
		уюи4
		уюо4
		уюу4
		уюъ4
		уюю4
		уюя4
		уяа4
		уяе4
		уяи4
		уяо4
		уяу4
		уяъ4
		уяю4
		уяя4
		ъаа4
		ъае4
		ъаи4
		ъао4
		ъау4
		ъаъ4
		ъаю4
		ъая4
		ъеа4
		ъее4
		ъеи4
		ъео4
		ъеу4
		ъеъ4
		ъею4
		ъея4
		ъиа4
		ъие4
		ъии4
		ъио4
		ъиу4
		ъиъ4
		ъию4
		ъия4
		ъоа4
		ъое4
		ъои4
		ъоо4
		ъоу4
		ъоъ4
		ъою4
		ъоя4
		ъуа4
		ъуе4
		ъуи4
		ъуо4
		ъуу4
		ъуъ4
		ъую4
		ъуя4
		ъъа4
		ъъе4
		ъъи4
		ъъо4
		ъъу4
		ъъъ4
		ъъю4
		ъъя4
		ъюа4
		ъюе4
		ъюи4
		ъюо4
		ъюу4
		ъюъ4
		ъюю4
		ъюя4
		ъяа4
		ъяе4
		ъяи4
		ъяо4
		ъяу4
		ъяъ4
		ъяю4
		ъяя4
		юаа4
		юае4
		юаи4
		юао4
		юау4
		юаъ4
		юаю4
		юая4
		юеа4
		юее4
		юеи4
		юео4
		юеу4
		юеъ4
		юею4
		юея4
		юиа4
		юие4
		юии4
		юио4
		юиу4
		юиъ4
		юию4
		юия4
		юоа4
		юое4
		юои4
		юоо4
		юоу4
		юоъ4
		юою4
		юоя4
		юуа4
		юуе4
		юуи4
		юуо4
		юуу4
		юуъ4
		юую4
		юуя4
		юъа4
		юъе4
		юъи4
		юъо4
		юъу4
		юъъ4
		юъю4
		юъя4
		ююа4
		ююе4
		ююи4
		ююо4
		ююу4
		ююъ4
		ююю4
		ююя4
		юяа4
		юяе4
		юяи4
		юяо4
		юяу4
		юяъ4
		юяю4
		юяя4
		яаа4
		яае4
		яаи4
		яао4
		яау4
		яаъ4
		яаю4
		яая4
		яеа4
		яее4
		яеи4
		яео4
		яеу4
		яеъ4
		яею4
		яея4
		яиа4
		яие4
		яии4
		яио4
		яиу4
		яиъ4
		яию4
		яия4
		яоа4
		яое4
		яои4
		яоо4
		яоу4
		яоъ4
		яою4
		яоя4
		яуа4
		яуе4
		яуи4
		яуо4
		яуу4
		яуъ4
		яую4
		яуя4
		яъа4
		яъе4
		яъи4
		яъо4
		яъу4
		яъъ4
		яъю4
		яъя4
		яюа4
		яюе4
		яюи4
		яюо4
		яюу4
		яюъ4
		яюю4
		яюя4
		яяа4
		яяе4
		яяи4
		яяо4
		яяу4
		яяъ4
		яяю4
		яяя4
		й4бб
		й4бв
		й4бг
		й4бд
		й4бж
		й4бз
		й4бй
		й4бк
		й4бл
		й4бм
		й4бн
		й4бп
		й4бр
		й4бс
		й4бт
		й4бф
		й4бх
		й4бц
		й4бч
		й4бш
		й4бщ
		й4вб
		й4вв
		й4вг
		й4вд
		й4вж
		й4вз
		й4вй
		й4вк
		й4вл
		й4вм
		й4вн
		й4вп
		й4вр
		й4вс
		й4вт
		й4вф
		й4вх
		й4вц
		й4вч
		й4вш
		й4вщ
		й4гб
		й4гв
		й4гг
		й4гд
		й4гж
		й4гз
		й4гй
		й4гк
		й4гл
		й4гм
		й4гн
		й4гп
		й4гр
		й4гс
		й4гт
		й4гф
		й4гх
		й4гц
		й4гч
		й4гш
		й4гщ
		й4дб
		й4дв
		й4дг
		й4дд
		й4дж
		й4дз
		й4дй
		й4дк
		й4дл
		й4дм
		й4дн
		й4дп
		й4др
		й4дс
		й4дт
		й4дф
		й4дх
		й4дц
		й4дч
		й4дш
		й4дщ
		й4жб
		й4жв
		й4жг
		й4жд
		й4жж
		й4жз
		й4жй
		й4жк
		й4жл
		й4жм
		й4жн
		й4жп
		й4жр
		й4жс
		й4жт
		й4жф
		й4жх
		й4жц
		й4жч
		й4жш
		й4жщ
		й4зб
		й4зв
		й4зг
		й4зд
		й4зж
		й4зз
		й4зй
		й4зк
		й4зл
		й4зм
		й4зн
		й4зп
		й4зр
		й4зс
		й4зт
		й4зф
		й4зх
		й4зц
		й4зч
		й4зш
		й4зщ
		й4йб
		й4йв
		й4йг
		й4йд
		й4йж
		й4йз
		й4йй
		й4йк
		й4йл
		й4йм
		й4йн
		й4йп
		й4йр
		й4йс
		й4йт
		й4йф
		й4йх
		й4йц
		й4йч
		й4йш
		й4йщ
		й4кб
		й4кв
		й4кг
		й4кд
		й4кж
		й4кз
		й4кй
		й4кк
		й4кл
		й4км
		й4кн
		й4кп
		й4кр
		й4кс
		й4кт
		й4кф
		й4кх
		й4кц
		й4кч
		й4кш
		й4кщ
		й4лб
		й4лв
		й4лг
		й4лд
		й4лж
		й4лз
		й4лй
		й4лк
		й4лл
		й4лм
		й4лн
		й4лп
		й4лр
		й4лс
		й4лт
		й4лф
		й4лх
		й4лц
		й4лч
		й4лш
		й4лщ
		й4мб
		й4мв
		й4мг
		й4мд
		й4мж
		й4мз
		й4мй
		й4мк
		й4мл
		й4мм
		й4мн
		й4мп
		й4мр
		й4мс
		й4мт
		й4мф
		й4мх
		й4мц
		й4мч
		й4мш
		й4мщ
		й4нб
		й4нв
		й4нг
		й4нд
		й4нж
		й4нз
		й4нй
		й4нк
		й4нл
		й4нм
		й4нн
		й4нп
		й4нр
		й4нс
		й4нт
		й4нф
		й4нх
		й4нц
		й4нч
		й4нш
		й4нщ
		й4пб
		й4пв
		й4пг
		й4пд
		й4пж
		й4пз
		й4пй
		й4пк
		й4пл
		й4пм
		й4пн
		й4пп
		й4пр
		й4пс
		й4пт
		й4пф
		й4пх
		й4пц
		й4пч
		й4пш
		й4пщ
		й4рб
		й4рв
		й4рг
		й4рд
		й4рж
		й4рз
		й4рй
		й4рк
		й4рл
		й4рм
		й4рн
		й4рп
		й4рр
		й4рс
		й4рт
		й4рф
		й4рх
		й4рц
		й4рч
		й4рш
		й4рщ
		й4сб
		й4св
		й4сг
		й4сд
		й4сж
		й4сз
		й4сй
		й4ск
		й4сл
		й4см
		й4сн
		й4сп
		й4ср
		й4сс
		й4ст
		й4сф
		й4сх
		й4сц
		й4сч
		й4сш
		й4сщ
		й4тб
		й4тв
		й4тг
		й4тд
		й4тж
		й4тз
		й4тй
		й4тк
		й4тл
		й4тм
		й4тн
		й4тп
		й4тр
		й4тс
		й4тт
		й4тф
		й4тх
		й4тц
		й4тч
		й4тш
		й4тщ
		й4фб
		й4фв
		й4фг
		й4фд
		й4фж
		й4фз
		й4фй
		й4фк
		й4фл
		й4фм
		й4фн
		й4фп
		й4фр
		й4фс
		й4фт
		й4фф
		й4фх
		й4фц
		й4фч
		й4фш
		й4фщ
		й4хб
		й4хв
		й4хг
		й4хд
		й4хж
		й4хз
		й4хй
		й4хк
		й4хл
		й4хм
		й4хн
		й4хп
		й4хр
		й4хс
		й4хт
		й4хф
		й4хх
		й4хц
		й4хч
		й4хш
		й4хщ
		й4цб
		й4цв
		й4цг
		й4цд
		й4цж
		й4цз
		й4цй
		й4цк
		й4цл
		й4цм
		й4цн
		й4цп
		й4цр
		й4цс
		й4цт
		й4цф
		й4цх
		й4цц
		й4цч
		й4цш
		й4цщ
		й4чб
		й4чв
		й4чг
		й4чд
		й4чж
		й4чз
		й4чй
		й4чк
		й4чл
		й4чм
		й4чн
		й4чп
		й4чр
		й4чс
		й4чт
		й4чф
		й4чх
		й4чц
		й4чч
		й4чш
		й4чщ
		й4шб
		й4шв
		й4шг
		й4шд
		й4шж
		й4шз
		й4шй
		й4шк
		й4шл
		й4шм
		й4шн
		й4шп
		й4шр
		й4шс
		й4шт
		й4шф
		й4шх
		й4шц
		й4шч
		й4шш
		й4шщ
		й4щб
		й4щв
		й4щг
		й4щд
		й4щж
		й4щз
		й4щй
		й4щк
		й4щл
		й4щм
		й4щн
		й4щп
		й4щр
		й4щс
		й4щт
		й4щф
		й4щх
		й4щц
		й4щч
		й4щш
		й4щщ
		б4ь
		в4ь
		г4ь
		д4ь
		ж4ь
		з4ь
		й4ь
		к4ь
		л4ь
		м4ь
		н4ь
		п4ь
		р4ь
		с4ь
		т4ь
		ф4ь
		х4ь
		ц4ь
		ч4ь
		ш4ь
		щ4ь
		ь4ь
		.дз4в
		.дж4р
		.дж4л
		.вг4л
		.вд4л
		.вг4р
		.вг4н
		.вп4л
		.вк4л
		.вк4р
		.вт4р
		.сг4л
		.зд4р
		.сг4р
		.сб4р
		.сд4р
		.жд4р
		.ск4л
		.сп4л
		.сп4р
		.ст4р
		.ск4р
		.шп4р
		.ск4в
		.вз4р
		.вс4л
		.вс4м
		.вс4р
		.св4р
		.сх4л
		.сх4р
		.хв4р
		.вс4т
		.сх4в
		.см4р
		н4кт.
		н4кс.
		к4ст.
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
